Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 27-103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 27-103. A public school or school district shall not be


a member of any school athletic association unless that association


has adopted a written policy that requires the following:


1. All records of the association to be made accessible


consistent with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Records Act;


2. All meetings of the association to be open and conducted in


a manner consistent with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting


Act, including specifically the notice and agenda, voting, and


executive session requirements. All hearings of the association


including, but not limited to, hearings for rule violations,

Req. No. 3239 Page 1


eligibility determinations, and requests for hardship waivers shall


be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act; and


3. An annual financial audit and a compliance audit of all


funds of the association in accordance with the auditing standards


set forth in the Oklahoma Public School Audit Law. In addition, the


association shall have performance audits conducted of the


operations of the association. A performance audit shall be


conducted no later than December 31, 2014, and by December 31 every


five (5) years thereafter.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3239 EB 1/13/2026 2:05:08 PM

















Req. No. 3239 Page 2